Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1214
Names not included in documents, when; state employee; how treated; prohibited act; violation; penalty.

(1) By majority vote, the committee may decide not to include in any document that will be a public record the names of persons providing information to the office or committee.

(2) No employee of the State of Nebraska who provides information to the committee or office shall be subject to any personnel action, as defined in section 81-2703, in connection with his or her employment as a result of the provision of such information.

(3) Any person exercising his or her supervisory or managerial authority to recommend, approve, direct, or otherwise take or affect personnel action in violation of subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be subject to personnel action up to and including dismissal from employment with the state.

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 588, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB39, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB539, § 4.